fr: Type d’applicateur pour sourcils: Pinceau angulaire; Applicateur peigne; Pied de biche; Compte-gouttes; Double embout (crayon et goupillon); Embout fourche; Micro-pinceau; Bille roulante; Goupillon; Crayon rétractable; Autre
nb: Øyenbrynspåførertype: Vinklet børste; Kamapplikator; Doe-foot; Dråpeteller; Dobbeltendet (blyant og spoolie); Gaffelspiss; Mikrobørste; Rullekule; Spooliebørste; Vriblyant; Annet
ko: 눈썹 어플리케이터 유형: 앵글 브러쉬; 빗 어플리케이터; 도우풋; 스포이드; 듀얼 엔드 (펜슬과 스풀리); 포크 팁; 마이크로 브러쉬; 롤러볼; 스풀리 브러쉬; 트위스트업 펜슬; 기타
en: Eyebrow applicator type: Angled brush; Comb applicator; Doe-foot; Dropper; Dual-ended (pencil and spoolie); Fork tip; Micro-brush; Roller ball; Spoolie brush; Twist-up pencil; Other
ro-RO: Tip aplicator pentru sprâncene: Pensulă unghiulară; Aplicator pieptene; Aplicator doe-foot; Flacon cu pipetă; Cu două capete (creion și spoolie); Vârf tip furcă; Micro-pensulă; Bilă rulantă; Pensulă spoolie; Creion retractabil; Altele
tr: Kaş aplikatör tipi: Açılı fırça; Tarak aplikatör; Doe-foot; Damlalık; Çift uçlu (kalem ve spoolie); Çatal uç; Mikro fırça; Masaj topu; Spoolie fırçası; Döner kalem; Diğer
lt-LT: Antakių aplikatoriaus tipas: Kampuotas šepetėlis; Šukučių aplikatorius; Lūpų blizgio tipo aplikatorius; Pipetė; Dvigalvis (pieštukas ir šepetėlis); Šakutės tipo antgalis; Mikro šepetėlis; Rutulio volelis; Spiralinis šepetėlis; Išsukamas pieštukas; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de aplicador de sobrancelha: Pincel angular; Aplicador pente; Aplicador doe-foot; Conta-gotas; Ponta dupla (lápis e spoolie); Ponta de forquilha; Micropincel; Esfera giratória; Pincel spoolie; Lápis retrátil; Outro
da: Øjenbrynsapplikatortype: Vinklet børste; Kam-applikator; Doe-foot; Dråber; Dobbeltende (blyant og spoolie); Gaffelspids; Mikrobørste; Rollerkugle; Spooliebørste; Drej-op-blyant; Andet
hr-HR: Tip aplikatora za obrve: Kutna četka; Aplikator češalj; Aplikator doe-foot; Kapaljka; Dvostrani (olovka i spoolie); Viljuškasti vrh; Mikro četka; Kuglica za valjanje; Spoolie četka; Olovka s okretanjem; Ostalo
sv: Ögonbrynsapplikatortyp: Vinklad borste; Kamapplikator; Doe-foot; Dropper; Dubbelsidig (penna och spoolie); Gaffelspets; Mikroborste; Rollerkula; Spoolieborste; Vridpenna; Övrigt
sl-SI: Tip aplikatorja za obrvi: Kotni čopič; Glavnik aplikator; Aplikator v obliki stopala; Kapalka; Dvostranski (svinčnik in spoolie); Vilicasta konica; Mikro čopič; Kroglica za valjanje; Spoolie čopič; Vrtljivi svinčnik; Drugo
hu: Szemöldök applikátor típusa: Ferde ecset; Fésűs applikátor; Őzláb applikátor; Csepp; Kétvégű (ceruza és spirál); Villa hegyű; Mikroecset; Görgős golyó; Spirál ecset; Feltekerhető ceruza; Egyéb
ru: Тип аппликатора для бровей: Скошенная кисть; Аппликатор-расческа; Аппликатор-лапка; Пипетка; Двусторонний (карандаш и щеточка); Наконечник-вилка; Микрокисть; Роликовый шарик; Щеточка для бровей; Выкручивающийся карандаш; Другой
vi: Loại dụng cụ bôi lông mày: Cọ góc; Lược thoa; Đầu thoa; Ống nhỏ giọt; Hai đầu (bút chì và cọ chải); Đầu nĩa; Cọ siêu nhỏ; Bi lăn; Cọ chải; Bút chì xoay; Khác
fi: Kulmatuotteen levittimen tyyppi: Kulmittainen sivellin; Kampalevittäjä; Doe-foot; Tiputin; Kaksipäinen (kynä ja spoolie); Haarukkakärki; Mikrosivellin; Rullakuula; Spoolie-sivellin; Kiertokynä; Muu
de: Augenbrauen-Applikatortyp: Abgeschrägter Pinsel; Kamm-Applikator; Doe-Foot-Applikator; Pipette; Doppelseitig (Stift und Bürste); Gabelspitze; Mikrobürste; Rollerball; Spoolie-Bürste; Drehstift; Sonstiges
cs: Typ aplikátoru na obočí: Úhlový štětec; Hřebenový aplikátor; Aplikátor typu laní nožka; Kapátko; Oboustranná tužka a kartáček; Vidličkový hrot; Mikro štěteček; Rollerová kulička; Kartáček na obočí; Otočná tužka; Jiné
el: Τύπος απλικατέρ φρυδιών: Γωνιακό πινέλο; Εφαρμοστής χτένα; Απλικατέρ σε σχήμα οπλής; Σταγονόμετρο; Διπλής άκρης (μολύβι και σπιράλ); Άκρη πιρουνιού; Μικροπινέλο; Σφαίρα κύλισης; Πινέλο σπιράλ; Περιστρεφόμενο μολύβι; Άλλο
nl: Wenkbrauwapplicatortype: Schuine kwast; Kam-applicator; Doe-foot; Druppelaar; Dubbelzijdig (potlood en spoolie); Vorkpunt; Microkwast; Rollerbal; Spooliekwast; Opdraaipotlood; Andere
sk-SK: Typ aplikátora na obočie: Šikmý štetec; Hrebeňový aplikátor; Aplikátor v tvare kopýtka; Kvapkadlo; Dvojkoncová (ceruzka a kefka); Vidličkový hrot; Mikro štetec; Valček; Kefka spoolie; Vyťahovacia ceruzka; Iné
ja: アイブロウアプリケータータイプ: アングルブラシ; コームアプリケーター; ドーフット; スポイト; 両端タイプ（ペンシル＆スプーリー）; フォークチップ; マイクロブラシ; ローラーボール; スプーリーブラシ; 繰り出し式ペンシル; その他
it: Tipo di applicatore per sopracciglia: Pennello angolato; Applicatore a pettine; Applicatore a piedino; Contagocce; Doppia estremità (matita e scovolino); Punta a forchetta; Micro-pennello; Sfera a rullo; Scovolino; Matita retrattile; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de aplicador de sobrancelha: Pincel angulado; Aplicador tipo pente; Aplicador doe-foot; Conta-gotas; Dupla ponta (lápis e spoolie); Ponta tipo garfo; Micropincel; Esfera rolante; Pincel spoolie; Lápis retrátil; Outro
zh-CN: 眉毛涂抹器类型: 斜角刷; 梳状涂抹器; 海绵头; 滴管; 双头（笔和螺旋刷）; 叉形头; 微型刷; 滚珠; 螺旋刷; 旋转笔; 其他
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ทาคิ้ว: แปรงเอียง; หวีทา; หัวโด; หลอดหยด; ดินสอสองหัว (ดินสอและแปรง); หัวส้อม; แปรงไมโคร; ลูกกลิ้ง; แปรงสปูลี่; ดินสอหมุน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 眉毛塗抹器類型: 斜角刷; 梳型塗抹器; 鹿蹄型; 滴管; 雙頭式（筆與螺旋刷）; 叉狀頭; 微細刷; 滾珠; 螺旋刷; 旋轉筆; 其他
es: Tipo de aplicador de cejas: Brocha angulada; Aplicador de peine; Aplicador doe-foot; Cuentagotas; Doble punta (lápiz y spoolie); Punta de tenedor; Micro brocha; Rodillo; Brocha spoolie; Lápiz retráctil; Otros
pl: Typ aplikatora do brwi: Skośny pędzel; Aplikator grzebieniowy; Aplikator stopkowy; Pipeta; Dwustronny (ołówek i szczoteczka); Końcówka widelcowa; Mikropędzelek; Kulka masująca; Szczoteczka spiralna; Ołówek automatyczny; Inne
bg-BG: Тип апликатор за вежди: Ъглова четка; Гребенчест апликатор; Апликатор тип еленово копитце; Капкомер; Двустранен (молив и спирала); Връх тип вилица; Микро четка; Ролкова топка; Спирална четка; Изваждащ се молив; Други